Massachusetts, session 194th, H1584.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 73 of Chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “not”, as appearing in line 12, the following new text:—“less than one
thousand dollars and not”.
SECTION 2. Section 73 of Chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding at the end thereof the following text:—
“The sentence imposed under this section shall not be reduced to less than 6 months, nor
suspended, nor shall any person convicted under this section be eligible for probation, parole or
furlough or receive any deduction from his sentence for good conduct until he shall have served
no less than 6 months of such sentence. Prosecutions commenced under this section shall neither
of 2

be continued without a finding nor placed on file. The provisions of section 87-seven of chapter
276 shall not apply to a person charged with a violation of this section.”
of 2